sq_AL.aff
FLAG long
SFX E9 Y 111
SFX E9 em kam em po:verb is:v_habt is:sg1
SFX E9 em ke em po:verb is:v_habt is:sg2
SFX E9 em ka em po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 em kemi em po:verb is:v_habt is:pl1
SFX E9 em keni em po:verb is:v_habt is:pl2
SFX E9 em kan em po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 s kam s po:verb is:v_habt is:sg1
SFX E9 s ke s po:verb is:v_habt is:sg2
SFX E9 s ka s po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 s kemi s po:verb is:v_habt is:pl1
SFX E9 s keni s po:verb is:v_habt is:pl2
SFX E9 s kan s po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 het eka [^bjlpv][iy]het po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 het ekan [^bjlpv][iy]het po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 het ekësh [^bjlpv][iy]het po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 het ekej [^bjlpv][iy]het po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 het ekëshin [^bjlpv][iy]het po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 het jtka [ae]het po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 het jtkan [ae]het po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 het jtkej [ae]het po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 het jtkësh [ae]het po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 het jtkëshin [ae]het po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 erret arrka erret po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 erret arrkan erret po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 erret arrkej erret po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 erret arrkësh erret po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 erret arrkëshin erret po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 irret jerrka irret po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 irret jerrkan irret po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 irret jerrkej irret po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 irret jerrkësh irret po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 irret jerrkëshin irret po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 het ajtka [lrv]uhet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 het ajtkan [lrv]uhet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 het ajtkej [lrv]uhet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 het ajtkësh [lrv]uhet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 het ajtkëshin [lrv]uhet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 bihet rënka bihet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 bihet rënkan bihet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 bihet rënkej bihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 bihet rënkësh bihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 bihet rënkëshin bihet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 ihet eka blihet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ekan blihet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 ihet ekej blihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ekësh blihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ekëshin blihet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 lihet jetka flihet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 lihet jetkan flihet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 lihet jetkej flihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 lihet jetkësh flihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 lihet jetkëshin flihet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 litet olka litet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 litet olkan litet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 litet olkej litet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 litet olkësh litet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 litet olkëshin litet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 shihet paka shihet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 shihet pakan shihet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 shihet pakej shihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 shihet pakësh shihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 shihet pakëshin shihet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 ihet ënka [hir][pv]ihet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ënkan [hir][pv]ihet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 ihet ënkej [hir][pv]ihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ënkësh [hir][pv]ihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ënkëshin [hir][pv]ihet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 uhet ënka huhet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 uhet ënkan huhet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 uhet ënkej huhet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 uhet ënkësh huhet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 uhet ënkëshin huhet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 ilet jelka ilet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 ilet jelkan ilet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 ilet jelkej ilet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ilet jelkësh ilet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ilet jelkëshin ilet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 illet jellka illet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 illet jellkan illet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 illet jellkej illet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 illet jellkësh illet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 illet jellkëshin illet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 iqet eqka iqet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 iqet eqkan iqet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 iqet eqkej iqet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 iqet eqkësh iqet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 iqet eqkëshin iqet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 iqet eqtë iqet po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX E9 iqet eqshin iqet po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX E9 ishet eshka ishet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 ishet eshkan ishet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 ishet eshkej ishet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ishet eshkësh ishet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ishet eshkëshin ishet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 ishet eshtë ishet po:verb is:v_dsht is:sg3
SFX E9 ishet eshçin ishet po:verb is:v_dsht is:pl3
SFX E9 ihet ajtka ëvihet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ajtkan ëvihet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 ihet ajtkej ëvihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ajtkësh ëvihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ajtkëshin ëvihet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 ihet ohka njihet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ohtkan njihet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 ihet ohkej njihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ohkësh njihet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 ihet ohkëshin njihet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX E9 itet eka ritet po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX E9 itet ekan ritet po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX E9 itet ekësh ritet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 itet ekej ritet po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX E9 itet ekëshin ritet po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3

SFX F1 Y 5
SFX F1 0 ka [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_habt is:sg3
SFX F1 0 kan [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_habt is:pl3
SFX F1 0 kej [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F1 0 kësh [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F1 0 këshin [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3

SFX F2 Y 4
SFX F2 0 kam [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_habt is:sg1
SFX F2 0 ke [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_habt is:sg2
SFX F2 0 kemi [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_habt is:pl1
SFX F2 0 keni [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_habt is:pl2

SFX F3 Y 98
SFX F3 bie prukësha bie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 bie prukëshe bie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 bie prukësh bie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 bie prukej bie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 bie prukëshim bie po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 bie prukëshit bie po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 bie prukëshin bie po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 bie rënkësha bie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 bie rënkëshe bie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 bie rënkësh bie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 bie rënkej bie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 bie rënkëshim bie po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 bie rënkëshit bie po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 bie rënkëshin bie po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 e itkësha gre po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 e itkëshe gre po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 e itkësh gre po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 e itkej gre po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 e itkëshim gre po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 e itkëshit gre po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 e itkëshin gre po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 ej yekësha ej po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 ej yekëshe ej po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 ej yekësh ej po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 ej yekej ej po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 ej yekëshim ej po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 ej yekëshit ej po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 ej yekëshin ej po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 ete ajtkësha ete po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 ete ajtkëshe ete po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 ete ajtkësh ete po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 ete ajtkej ete po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 ete ajtkëshim ete po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 ete ajtkëshit ete po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 ete ajtkëshin ete po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 ha ngrënkësha ha po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 ha ngrënkëshe ha po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 ha ngrënkësh ha po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 ha ngrënkej ha po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 ha ngrënkëshim ha po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 ha ngrënkëshit ha po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 ha ngrënkëshin ha po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 i kësha [ckp]i po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 i këshe [ckp]i po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 i kësh [ckp]i po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 i kej [ckp]i po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 i këshim [ckp]i po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 i këshit [ckp]i po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 i këshin [ckp]i po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 ie ënkësha [pt]ie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 ie ënkëshe [pt]ie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 ie ënkësh [pt]ie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 ie ënkej [pt]ie po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 ie ënkëshim [pt]ie po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 ie ënkëshit [pt]ie po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 ie ënkëshin [pt]ie po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 le jetkësha le po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 le jetkëshe le po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 le jetkësh le po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 le jetkej le po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 le jetkëshim le po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 le jetkëshit le po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 le jetkëshin le po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 shoh pakësha shoh po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 shoh pakëshe shoh po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 shoh pakësh shoh po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 shoh pakej shoh po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 shoh pakëshim shoh po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 shoh pakëshit shoh po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 shoh pakëshin shoh po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 ua ashkësha ua po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 ua ashkëshe ua po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 ua ashkësh ua po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 ua ashkej ua po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 ua ashkëshim ua po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 ua ashkëshit ua po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 ua ashkëshin ua po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 em kësha em po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 em këshe em po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 em kësh em po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 em kej em po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 em këshim em po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 em këshit em po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 em këshin em po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 jap dhënkësha jap po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 jap dhënkëshe jap po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 jap dhënkësh jap po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 jap dhënkej jap po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 jap dhënkëshim jap po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 jap dhënkëshit jap po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 jap dhënkëshin jap po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
SFX F3 s kësha s po:verb is:v_habp is:sg1
SFX F3 s këshe s po:verb is:v_habp is:sg2
SFX F3 s kësh s po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 s kej s po:verb is:v_habp is:sg3
SFX F3 s këshim s po:verb is:v_habp is:pl1
SFX F3 s këshit s po:verb is:v_habp is:pl2
SFX F3 s këshin s po:verb is:v_habp is:pl3
